California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(C) Any other information as the assessor may require. 

The entity owning the mobilehome park shall file an annual statement for each succeeding assessment year, on or before April 1, with the assessor, setting forth any changes to the required information known to the entity. The information provided pursuant to this section is not a public document and shall not be open to public inspection, except as provided in Section 408. 

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require applicants for separate assessments to meet the requirements of the Subdivision Map Act, nor shall the approval of any governmental agency be required for separate assessment except for the assessor’s approval. 

(e) The assessor shall cumulate all the separate assessments in a mobilehome park and enter the total assessment on the secured roll in the name of the entity which owns the park. The assessor shall notify each owner of a portion of the real property of the park subject to separate assessment under this section of the amount of an increased assessment pursuant to Section 619. 

(f) The tax on the total assessment of the mobilehome park shall be a lien on the real property of the park and shall be subject to all provisions of law applicable to taxes on the secured roll. 

(g) The tax collector shall send a single tax bill, with an itemized breakdown detailing the taxes and the allocated portion of any fee imposed pursuant to subdivision (i) applicable to each separate assessment, to the entity owning the mobilehome park. 

(h) The assessor shall provide to owners of voting stock or other ownership or membership interest in a mobilehome park entity subject to subdivision (c) of Section 62.1, and to the governing board of the park, at that time and in that manner as the assessor deems appropriate, adequate notice of the provisions of this section and other pertinent information relative to the implementation thereof. 

(i) The county may charge a fee for processing the application for separate assessment, and for the initial and ongoing costs of separate assessment and implementing subdivision (g), not to exceed actual costs. This fee shall be subject to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 54985) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and shall be allocated to each owner of a share of voting stock or other ownership or membership interest for which a separate assessment has been made. The fee may be collected commencing with the initial separate tax bills, and on subsequent tax bills, and shall be deposited in the county’s general fund.

(j) The governing board of the entity which owns the mobilehome park shall collect the allocated portion of any fee charged pursuant to subdivision (i) and any itemized taxes applicable to a separate assessment from the owner of the voting stock or other ownership or membership interest whose acquisition of the interest resulted in the separate assessment. The fees and taxes resulting from separate assessment shall be deducted from the proportional cost of the fees and taxes collected from the remaining owners or members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 532, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.11.

The assessor shall separately assess undivided interests in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2801) of Part 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1222, Sec. 13.5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2189.

(a) A tax on personal property is a lien on any real property on the secured roll also belonging to the owner of the personal property, if the personal property is located upon that real property on the lien date, and if the fact of the lien is shown on the secured roll opposite the description of the real property. However, if that real property is transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value after the lien date, but prior to the date upon which the assessment on the personal property is made, and the purchaser of that property did not own, claim, possess, or control the personal property at any time from the lien date until the date upon which that assessment was made, the taxes on the personal property shall be placed on the unsecured roll and shall not be a lien on the real property.

(b) Any failure or omission to show the fact of a lien as described in subdivision (a) for personal property taxes on the secured roll opposite the description of real property shall not operate to invalidate those personal property taxes, but in that case the tax shall be collected in the same manner as taxes on the unsecured roll. However, if the fact of lien is erroneously entered on the secured roll opposite the description of real property belonging to someone other than the owner of the personal property on the lien date, then the delinquency penalty provided for in Chapter 4 of Part 5 shall not attach until December 10 at 5 p.m. or, if December 10th falls on Saturday, Sunday, or a holiday at 5 p.m. on the next business day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 229, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2189.1.

Separately billed taxes on state-assessed personal property when delinquent may be collected through use of unsecured tax collection procedures. Any of those taxes, including penalties and cost charge, which remain unpaid after June 30, shall be transferred to the unsecured roll or abstract and shall become subject to additional penalties as provided in Section 2922.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1420, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

2189.3.

A tax on personal property belonging to an owner of real property on the secured roll located in the same county as the personal property, where the personal property is not located upon the real property on the lien date, is, on and after the lien date, a lien on the real property, having the force, effect and priority of a judgment lien from and after the lien date, if, on or before the lien date:

(a) The assessor, at his or her discretion, with the approval of the board of supervisors, and at the request of the taxpayer, determines and issues to the taxpayer a certificate that the real property is sufficient to secure the payment of the tax.

(b) The taxpayer records the certificate with the county recorder.

Any tax which becomes a lien on the real property in accordance with this section shall be subject to the provisions of this division relating to the rate and date of payment of taxes on the secured roll for the current year; and in the event of any delinquency in the payment of such tax, the personal property on which it has been levied shall be subject to seizure and sale in accordance with Sections 2951 to 2963, inclusive, of this code.

This section does not apply to any tax which became a lien on the first Monday in March of 1958, and shall first be operative with respect to taxes levied for the fiscal year 1959–60.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 542, Sec. 4.   Effective September 9, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

2189.5.

Every tax on personal property and improvements, located upon or appurtenant to a leasehold estate for the production of gas, petroleum or other hydrocarbon substances from beneath the surface of the earth, and belonging to the owner of the leasehold estate, may be secured by the leasehold estate, when, in the opinion of the assessor, the leasehold estate is of sufficient value to constitute security for the payment of all taxes upon that personal property or improvements and upon that leasehold estate. In the event of delinquency in the payment of that tax, the personal property, improvements, and leasehold estate shall be subject to seizure and sale in the same manner as provided for the seizure and sale of unsecured personal property, in Sections 2951 to 2962, inclusive, at any time within three years after the delinquency. Suit may be brought against an assessee of those taxes in the event of delinquency in the payment thereof.

If the tax thereon remains unpaid at the time set for the declaration of default for delinquent taxes, the tax together with any penalty and costs as may have accrued thereon while on the secured roll shall be transferred to the unsecured roll.

Those taxes that are delinquent at the time the amendment to this section, enacted at the 1973–74 Regular Session, goes into effect may also be transferred to the current unsecured roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 121, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2189.6.

Improvements that constitute component parts of a water distribution system located in whole or in part on property assessed to a person other than the assessee of the land on which they are located shall be assessed as improvements on the secured roll. However, those assessments shall not be a lien on the land on which those improvements are located and that fact shall be noted on the secured roll.

If the tax thereon is unpaid when any installment of secured taxes becomes delinquent, the tax collector may use the same collection procedures available for the collection of taxes on the unsecured roll.

If the tax thereon remains unpaid at the time set for the declaration of default for delinquent taxes, the tax together with any penalty and costs that may have accrued thereon while on the secured roll shall be transferred to the unsecured roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 121, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2189.7.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a), (b), or (c), the assessment of any floating home made pursuant to Section 229 shall be entered on the secured roll and shall be subject to all provisions of law applicable to taxes on the secured roll.

(a) If the taxes on any floating home are not a lien on real property of the owner of the floating home pursuant to Section 2188.1, 2189, or 2189.3 and are unpaid when any installment of taxes on the secured roll becomes delinquent, the tax collector may use the procedures applicable to the collection of delinquent taxes on the unsecured roll.

(b) If the taxes on any floating home which are not a lien on real property of the owner of the floating home remain unpaid at the time set for the declaration of default for delinquent taxes of the floating home on the secured roll, the taxes, together with any penalties and costs which may have accrued thereon while on the secured roll, shall be transferred to the unsecured roll.

(c) The taxes on floating homes may be paid in two installments as provided in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 2700) of Part 5, notwithstanding Section 2605 and whether or not the county board of supervisors has adopted a resolution in accordance with Section 2700.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1420, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2189.8.

Upon application, the county tax collector may issue tax clearance certificates. Those certificates shall be used to permit registration of used floating homes, as defined in Section 18075.6 of the Health and Safety Code, and for any other purposes as may be prescribed by the Controller. The certificates may indicate that the county tax collector finds that no local property tax is due or is likely to become due, or that any applicable local property taxes have been paid or are to be paid in a manner not requiring the withholding of registration or the transfer of registration. The certificates shall be in any form which the Controller may prescribe, and shall be executed, issued, and accepted for clearance of registration or permit issuance on any conditions which the Controller may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1420, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

2190.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the assessment of any possessory interest in tax-exempt real estate to which the exemption authorized by Section 218 has been applied shall be entered on the secured roll. However, the assessment shall not be a lien on the tax-exempt real estate and that fact shall be noted on the secured roll.

If the tax thereon is unpaid when any installment of taxes on the secured roll becomes delinquent, the tax collector may use the procedures which are applicable to the collection of taxes on the unsecured roll.

If the tax thereon remains unpaid at the time set for the declaration of default for delinquent taxes, the tax applicable to the possessory interest together with any penalties and costs which may have accrued thereon while on the secured roll shall be transferred to the unsecured roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

2190.1.

If the tax on an assessment of a possessory interest in real estate of the Veterans Welfare Board is not paid before delinquency, the amount of the tax, penalties and costs shall be paid by said board and added to the amount due under the contract for the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 324.)
-------------------------------------------

2190.2.

Every tax on an assessment of a possessory interest or a tax on an assessment of improvements made pursuant to the provisions of Section 2188.2 shall become a lien on such possessory interest or such improvements, provided that in those instances where the real property that is the subject of such possessory interest or upon which such improvements are located is not tax-exempt land, the fact of such lien shall be indicated on the secured roll where the real property that is the subject of such possessory interest or upon which such improvements are located is listed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.3.

(a) The tax collector may make the filing specified in subdivision (b) where either of the following occurs:

(1) There is a tax on any of the following:

(A) A possessory interest secured only by a lien on that taxed possessory interest.

(B) Goods in transit, not secured by any lien on real property.

(C) Improvements that have been assessed pursuant to Section 2188.2.

(D) Off-roll taxes on escape assessments where the error was not the fault of the assessee and the escape taxes are being paid pursuant to Section 4837.5.

(E) Unsecured property not secured by a lien on any real property, and where the tax has become delinquent or where there are prior unpaid and delinquent taxes with respect to that same property.

(2) A tax has been entered on the unsecured roll pursuant to Section 482, 531.2, or 4836.5, or transferred to the unsecured roll pursuant to any provision of law.

(b) A filing for record without fee in the office of the county recorder of any county of a certificate specifying the amount due, the name, the last four digits of his or her federal social security number, if known, and last known address of the assessee liable for the amount, and compliance with all provisions of this division with respect to the computation and levy of the tax if compliance has in fact occurred. The procedure authorized by this section is cumulative to the procedure provided by Sections 2951 and 3003. The county recorder shall, within 30 days after a filing as described in this subdivision with respect to delinquent taxes on unsecured property, send a notice of the filing to the assessee at the assessee’s last known address. The notice shall contain the information contained in the filing, and shall prominently display on its face the following heading:

“THIS IS TO NOTIFY YOU THAT A TAX LIEN HAS BEEN FILED WITH RESPECT TO UNSECURED PROPERTY”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 189, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.4.

From the time of filing the certificate for record pursuant to Section 2191.3, the amount required to be paid together with interest and penalty constitutes a lien upon all personal and real property in the county owned by and then assessed to and in the same name as the assessee named in the certificate or acquired by him or her in that name before the lien expires, except that the lien upon unsecured property shall not be valid against a purchaser for value or encumbrancer without actual knowledge of the lien when he or she acquires his or her interest in the property. The lien has the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien and continues for 10 years from the time of the recording of the certificate unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

Within 10 years from the date of the recording of the certificate or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien, the lien may be extended by filing for record a new certificate in the office of any county recorder and from the time of the filing the lien as obtained under the original certificate shall be extended to all personal and real property in the county owned by the assessee for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. Execution shall issue upon the lien upon request of the tax collector or the official collecting taxes on the unsecured roll in the same manner as execution may issue upon other judgments, and sales shall be held under that execution as prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 546, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.5.

Section 2191.4 does not give the county a preference over any other lien which attached prior to the date when the certificate of delinquency of unsecured property tax, tax on possessory interest, tax on goods in transit or such tax on improvements respectively, was recorded, and the lien set forth in Section 2191.4 is subordinate to the preferences given to claims for personal services by Sections 1204 and 1206 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.6.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 2191.4, the lien resulting from the recording of the certificate pursuant to Section 2191.3 shall be removed and discharged either:

(a) Upon payment of the tax, any applicable penalty and interest, and a recording fee in the amount required by Section 27361.3 of the Government Code for each release of lien issued for each county in which the certificate was recorded, and upon the recording of a certificate of release or discharge of the lien in the office of the recorder of each county in which the certificate was filed. The recording fee, together with a certificate of release or discharge, shall be transmitted to the county recorder who shall record the certificate; or

(b) When the tax is legally canceled and a certificate of release or discharge is recorded in the office of the county recorder. A recording under this subdivision shall be made without fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.10.

Notwithstanding any other law, the board of supervisors of a county may adopt an ordinance or resolution to provide that a tax on real or personal property is not a lien against the property assessed or the assessee and shall not be recorded by the tax collector if the amount of the tax assessed against the property or the assessee is less than an amount set by that ordinance or resolution, up to two hundred dollars ($200), excluding any interest, penalties, or other fees. This section does not authorize a county to exempt any property from taxation, and does not
 relieve the taxpayer from the obligation to pay any tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 164, Sec. 1.   (SB 624)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2192.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, all tax liens attach annually as of 12:01 a.m. on the first day of January preceding the fiscal year for which the taxes are levied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 499, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2192.1.

Every tax declared in this chapter to be a lien on real property, and every public improvement assessment declared by law to be a lien on real property, have priority over all other liens on the property, regardless of the time of their creation. Any tax or assessment described in the preceding sentence shall be given priority over matters including, but not limited to, any recognizance, deed, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility with respect to which the subject real property may become charged or liable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 853, Sec. 1.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2192.2.

Upon the sale, other than a tax sale under this division or a sale pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 2920) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, conducted under judicial process or otherwise by any sheriff, trustee, receiver, or other ministerial officer, of any real property upon which ad valorem property taxes or assessments are due and unpaid at the time of sale, the proceeds from that sale shall, after the payment of necessary and incidental sale expenses, be first applied to the amount of those ad valorem property taxes and assessments and be transmitted by the conducting officer to the officer responsible for the collection of those taxes and assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 139.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2193.

Every lien created by this division has the effect of an execution duly levied against the property subject to the lien.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 611.)
-------------------------------------------

2194.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the judgment is satisfied and the lien removed when, but not before, either of the following occur:

(1) The tax is paid or legally canceled.

(2) The property is sold to satisfy the tax lien.

(b) For purposes of this section, the tax is not deemed paid or legally canceled by virtue of a sale of a tax certificate for that tax pursuant to Section 4521.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 189, Sec. 1.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2195.

Thirty years after any tax becomes a lien, if the lien has not been otherwise removed, the lien ceases to exist and the tax is conclusively presumed to be paid. The official having charge of the records of the tax shall mark it “Conclusively presumed paid.” Property for which a power to sell has been recorded for nonpayment of taxes is not subject to the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 546, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2196.

(a) If the tax collector determines, following the presentation of evidence by the owner or assessee of real property, that a lien on that property for unpaid taxes, assessments, fees, or charges levied by a local public entity has been erroneously filed for recordation, the tax collector shall send a document to the recorder stating the facts that indicate the erroneous filing. The document shall be clearly labeled with the words “Removal of Invalid Lien,” and shall be signed by either the tax collector or his or her deputy.

(b) The recorder shall mail the original “Removal of Invalid Lien” document to the owner of the property after recording the document.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local public entity” means a county, a city, or a district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 497, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Reimbursement for Costs Mandated by the State [2201. - 2326.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [2201. - 2216.]

2201.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in this article govern the construction of this chapter. The definition of a word applies to any variants thereof; the singular tense of a word includes the plural.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2202.

“Ad valorem property taxation” means any source of revenue derived from applying a property tax rate to the assessed value of property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2203.

“City” means any city whether general law or charter, except a city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2204.

“Classification of property” means any enumeration or grouping of property by a statute which results in it being treated differently from other property for purposes of taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2205.

“Costs mandated by the courts” means any increased costs incurred by a local agency or school district in order to comply with a final court order issued after January 1, 1973, or with a final court order issued prior to July 1, 1972, if the costs incurred by a local agency or school district as a result thereof are not incurred until after June 30, 1973. “Costs mandated by the courts” do not include (i) costs incurred as a result of a judgment in an eminent domain or condemnation proceeding, (ii) costs incurred in order to comply with a final court order mandating the specific performance, or awarding damages as a result of nonperformance, of any contract or agreement entered into after January 1, 1973, and (iii) costs incurred as a result of a final court order which requires a local agency or school district to comply with a state-mandated program or service enacted after January 1, 1973, which the court has determined that the local agency or school district has failed to comply with prior to such order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1256, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2206.

“Costs mandated by the federal government” means any increased costs mandated specifically by the federal government upon a local agency or school district after January 1, 1973, in order to comply with requirements of federal statute or regulation. “Costs mandated by the federal government” includes costs resulting from enactment of a state law or regulation where failure to enact such law or regulation to meet specific federal program or service requirements would result in substantial monetary penalties or loss of funds to public or private persons in the state. “Costs mandated by the federal government” does not include costs which are specifically reimbursed or funded by the federal or state government or programs or services which may be implemented at the option of the state, local agency, or school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1256, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2206.5.

“Costs mandated by the voters” means any increased costs expressly mandated upon a local agency or school district after September 2, 1975, by any statute or any amendment to the State Constitution adopted or enacted pursuant to the approval of a statewide ballot measure by the voters. “Costs mandated by the voters” does not include costs which are specifically reimbursed or funded by the terms of such ballot measure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 794.)
-------------------------------------------

2208.

“County” means any chartered or general law county. “County” includes a city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2208.5.

“School district” means any school district, community college district, or county superintendent of schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1135.)
-------------------------------------------

2209.

“Executive order” means any order, plan, requirement, rule or regulation issued:

(a) By the Governor, or

(b) By any officer or official serving at the pleasure of the Governor, or

(c) By any agency, department, board or commission of state government; provided that the term “executive order” shall not include any order, plan, requirement, rule or regulation issued by the State Water Resources Control Board or by any regional water quality control board pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Water Resources Control Board and regional water quality control boards will not adopt enforcement orders against publicly owned dischargers which mandate major waste water treatment facility construction costs unless federal financial assistance and state financial assistance pursuant to the Clean Water Bond Act of 1970 and 1974, is simultaneously made available.

“Major” means either a new treatment facility or an addition to an existing facility, the cost of which is in excess of 20 percent of the cost of replacing the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 486.)
-------------------------------------------

2210.

“Law enacted after January 1, 1973,” means any statute enacted by the Legislature after January 1, 1973.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 486.)
-------------------------------------------

2211.

“Local agency” means any city, county, special district, authority or other political subdivision of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 242, Sec. 8.   Effective July 21, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

2212.

“Percentage change in the cost of living” means the percentage change from April 1 of the prior year to April 1 of the current year in the California Consumer Price Index for all items, as determined by the California Department of Industrial Relations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2213.

“Property tax rate” means any rate of tax or assessment which is levied per unit of assessed value of property. “Property tax rate” includes any rate or assessment which is levied on the value of land only, as well as any rate or assessment which is levied on the value of land and improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2214.

“Sales tax exemption” means any provision which causes a reduction in revenue to a city or county under Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

2215.

“Special district” means any agency of the state for the local performance of governmental or proprietary functions within limited boundaries. “Special district” includes a county service area, a maintenance district or area, an improvement district or improvement zone, or any other zone or area, formed for the purpose of designating an area within which a property tax rate will be levied to pay for a service or improvement benefiting that area. “Special district” does not include a city, a county, a school district or a community college district. “Special district” does not include any agency which is not authorized by statute to levy a property tax rate or receive an allocation of property tax revenues. However, for the purpose of the allocation of property taxes pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5, and notwithstanding Section 2237, any special district authorized to levy a property tax or receive an allocation of property tax by the statute under which the district was formed shall be considered a special district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 643, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2216.

County free libraries established pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 27151) of Division 20 of the Education Code; areas receiving county fire protection services pursuant to Section 25643 of the Government Code; and county road districts established pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1550) of Division 2 of the Streets and Highways Code, shall be considered “special districts” for all purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [2227. - 2237.5.]

2227.

(a) (1) Annually, the Department of Finance shall transmit to each city and each county an estimate of the percentage change in the population of the city or the county. The estimates shall indicate the percentage change in the resident population, excluding the population in state mental and correctional facilities and in federal correctional and federal military installations, of each city and each county between January 1 of the prior year and January 1 of the
 current year. Except as provided in paragraph (2), those statements shall be transmitted by May 1.

(2) For the 2021 calendar year, the statement required by paragraph (1) shall be transmitted by May 7.

(b) The Department of Finance may request data from any local agency to be used to prepare the population estimate required by this section. If any local agency fails to supply the requested data, the department is not required to provide an estimate for that agency, but may do
 so using the method deemed most appropriate by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 8, Sec. 3.   (SB 88)   Effective February 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2228.

(a) The annual percentage change in population for special districts shall be the percentage changes established pursuant to Section 2227 and this section:

(1) If a special district is located entirely within a city, the annual percentage change in population for the district shall be that established for the city pursuant to Section 2227.

(2) If a special district is located entirely within the unincorporated area of a county, the annual percentage change in population for the district shall be that established for the county or the unincorporated area of the county.

(3) If a special district is located within a single county or within more than one city or any combination of cities and unincorporated areas within a single county, the annual percentage change in population for the district shall be that established for the county or the weighted average of the percentage change of each city and the unincorporated area.

(4) If a special district is located within more than one county, the annual percentage change in population for the district shall be the weighted average of the percentage change of each county or city or unincorporated area within the district or any combination, provided that the areas selected are mutually exclusive.

(b) The Department of Finance may request data from any local jurisdiction to be used to prepare the percentage change in population required by this section. The Department of Finance shall determine the weights to be used in establishing weighted averages.

(c) If the governing body of a special district determines that the percentage change in population in subdivision (a) will not be accurate for the district, it may, before June 1, request the Department of Finance to prepare a special population change estimate for the district. The department shall comply with the request before September 1, and the estimate prepared by the department shall be used to determine population change for purposes of this chapter. The district shall reimburse the department for the actual cost of preparing the estimate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

2228.1.

(a) Annually, the Department of Finance shall transmit to each community college district an estimate of its annual percentage change in adult population. Such estimates shall indicate the percentage change in the resident population within the geographic boundaries of the district consistent with the geographic boundaries used to determine the assessed valuation for the current and budget fiscal years excluding the population in state and federal correctional institutions and all full-time enrollment associated with four-year educational institutions with an enrollment of 3,000 or more and persons residing in military barracks of each district between January 1 of the prior year and January 1 of the current year if possible, or between the fall school census week of the prior fiscal year and the fall school census week of the current year. Such statements shall be transmitted by May 15.

The Department of Finance may request data from any local agency to be used to prepare the population estimate required by this section. If any local agency fails to supply the requested data, the department is not required to provide an estimate for the school district affected, but may do so using the method deemed most appropriate by the department after first notifying the community college district.

(b) If the total population of a district as currently delineated was within 15 percent of the total population of one or more cities or counties or city and county each of whose population is 50 percent or more within the district as of the most recent federal special or decennial census or local census carried out under the Department of Finance supervision covering the area in question, it may apply to the Department of Finance for a special estimate of the percentage change in total population of the corresponding area for the past year. The department will prepare the estimate in accordance with the data and methods used pursuant to Section 2227 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and the district may use the estimate in lieu of the estimate prepared under subdivision (a) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------

2229.

(a) Any classification or exemption of property for purposes of ad valorem property taxation enacted by the Legislature after January 1, 1973, shall be reimbursed by the state for the 1973–1974 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter.

(b) For purposes of this section the actual loss of revenue does not include potential revenue from property of a type which was not being assessed and taxed on January 1, 1973.

(c) Upon appropriation of reimbursement funds by the Legislature, each county auditor shall file a claim with the Controller on or before September 30 for reimbursement of the tax loss attributable to the exemption. The Controller shall pay on or before December 30 of each year one-half of the amount claimed and shall pay the other one-half on or before April 30. The Controller may audit, or may request the State Board of Equalization to audit, any of these claims or payments. This section does not apply to classes of property affected by Sections 988, 1152, 5303, and subdivision (c) of Section 227.

(d) The Legislative Analyst shall review any classification or exemption of property to which this section is applicable and shall report to the Legislature on the general economic effects thereof. This report shall be submitted at least one year prior to the date on which the classification or exemption is scheduled to terminate.

(e) Any claim alleging that the reimbursement requirements of this section have not been complied with shall be presented directly to the Legislature and Sections 905.2 and 945.4 of the Government Code shall not apply thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 229, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2230.
